Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Houston, TX|June 17, 2016
[This was transcribed and punctuated by Factba.se's AI, Margaret, and automatically corrected based on her understanding of Donald Trump's speech patterns. It has not been edited by a human. Please double-check any quotes against the video.]
All over the place, wow! What a group wow! What a group wow! What a group. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. I love you. We love textures. I love you. I - I love you. We love textures. I love you. I - I love you. We love textures. I love you. I love you texture. Hey, thank you.
Wow, thank you. Wow. Thank you, wow. Thank you everybody. Somebody asked me. Thank you everybody. Somebody asked me, thank you everybody. Somebody asked me how do you think you're going to do in - how do you think you're going to do in - how do you think you're going to do in Texas? I think we're gonna do very well.
Texas, I think we're gonna do very well. Texas, I think we're gonna do very well in Texas. So I have to say this, you know, you have - so I have to say this, you know, you have - so I have to say this, you know, you have to see what's going on outside there are to see what's going on outside there are to see what's Going on outside, there are lines that are 2, 2 miles long, I don't lines that are 2, 2 miles long.
I don't lines that are 2, 2 miles long. I don't know and I'm not just saying this even know and I'm not just saying this even know. And I'm not just saying this, even the press for the first time and they've the press for the first time and they've the press for the first time and they've seen 35,000 crowds with me.
But I think seen 35,000 crowds with me. But I think seen 35,000 crowds with me, but I think they're even impressed. And to be honest, they're even impressed. And to be honest, they're even impressed. And to be honest with you, I mean, which is coming in and with you, I mean, which is coming in and with you, I mean, which is coming in and you took it about miles and miles of - you took it about miles and miles of you took It about miles and miles of people and I wish the fire department people and I wish the fire department people and I wish the fire department and they're great, they were wonderful and they're great, they were wonderful and they're great.
They were wonderful, but they broke the all-time record for, but they broke the all-time record for, but they broke the all-time record for this building by far. And I see like you this building by far and I see like you this building by far. And I see like you can squeeze a couple of people from can squeeze a couple of people from can squeeze a couple of people from outside.
But I guess you know that's the outside, but I guess you know that's the outside. But I guess you know that's the fire marshals. We have to go by our fire fire marshals. We have to go by our fire fire marshals. We have to go by our fire marshals, would anybody like to leave? So marshals would anybody like to leave?
So marshals would anybody like to leave so that some more people could come in, I that some more people could come in, I that some more people could come in. I don't think, don't think, don't think. Well, I want to thank you. This is a great well, I want to thank you. This is a great well, I want to thank you.
This is a great honor. You think this is easy, right honor you think this is easy, right honor you think this is easy, right? You think. So I get up this morning, I'm you think so I get up this morning. I'm you think so I get up this morning. I'm like one of the early birds like a lot like one of the early birds like a lot like one of the early birds.
Like a lot of you people, everybody's an early bird of you people, everybody's an early bird of you people. Everybody's an early bird in this group, I think. But I got up and I - in this group I think, but I got up and I in this group I think, but I got up and I was in Dallas and last night we made a - was in Dallas and last night we made a - was in Dallas And last night we made a speech in Dallas and we had an amazing speech in Dallas and we had an amazing speech in Dallas and we had an amazing crowd there to Gilley's.
We had a packed crowd there to Gilley's. We had a packed crowd there to Gilley's. We had a packed house and we had thousands of people house and we had thousands of people house and we had thousands of people outside that they actually thought were outside that they actually thought were outside that. They actually thought were protestors, they weren't - there were protestors, they weren't - there were protestors, they weren't.
There were people that couldn't get into the venue, people that couldn't get into the venue, people that couldn't get into the venue thousands. And then - and then we went to thousands and then - and then we went to thousands. And then - and then we went to San Antonio and we raised - oh, we have San Antonio and we raised, oh, we have San Antonio and we raised, oh, we have some San Antonio and we raised a lot of some San Antonio and we raised a lot of - Some San Antonio and we raised a lot of money over the last two days for the money over the last two days for the money over the last two days for the party.
The party is doing very well. The party, the party is doing very well. The party the party is doing very well, the party is so the party is actually liking party is, so the party is actually liking party is. So the party is actually liking me me me. You know, I'm an outsider - I'm an outsider, you know, I'm an outsider, I'm an outsider, you know, I'm an outsider, I'm an outsider and historically they don't love the - and historically they don't love the - and historically they don't love the outsiders, but I think they're starting outsiders.
But I think they're starting outsiders, but I think they're starting to like to be and maybe there'll be a to like to be and maybe there'll be a to like to be. And maybe there'll be a few - you know, you don't hear about the few. You know, you don't hear about the few, you know, you don't hear about the tremendous numbers of people and I'm tremendous numbers of people and I'm tremendous numbers of people and I'm even talking about the politicians that even talking about the politicians that even talking about the Politicians that are totally supportive, if one person are totally supportive, if one person are totally supportive, if one person raises a little question, it's like, oh, raises a little question, it's like, oh, raises a little question, it's like, oh, did you hear?
Let me tell you folks. We did you hear, let me tell you folks, we did you hear. Let me tell you folks, we have tremendous support, tremendous, but have tremendous support, tremendous, but have tremendous support, tremendous. But the biggest support of all by far, right, the biggest support of all by far, right?
The biggest support of all by far right here. I'm the messenger right here, right here. I'm the messenger right here, right here. I'm the messenger right here, right here. We have - we have support like here we have - we have support like here we have - we have support like perhaps nobody's ever had when they've perhaps nobody's ever had when they've perhaps nobody's ever had when they've run for office.
Certainly at this stage, I run for office. Certainly at this stage I run for office certainly at this stage I don't think anybody's ever seen anything, don't think anybody's ever seen anything. Don't think anybody's ever seen anything like this. Some of the pundits actually like this. Some of the pundits actually like this.
Some of the pundits - actually some of the pundits that hate me, they - some of the pundits that hate me, they - some of the pundits that hate me, they hate me with a passion like which is hate me with a passion like which is hate me with a Passion like which is great, I love that. Oh, I love that. Look at great, I love that.
Oh, I love that. Look at great, I love that. Oh, I love that. Look at that Mexicans for Trump Mexicans the - that Mexicans for Trump Mexicans the - that Mexicans for Trump Mexicans the truck. I love it, I love it. I love that. Thank you. Thank you. That's I love that. Thank you. Thank you. That's I love that.
Thank you. Thank you. That's cool man. And you know why it's Mexicans cool man and you know why it's Mexicans cool man and you know why it's Mexicans to jump because I'm gonna bring jobs to jump because I'm gonna bring jobs to jump because I'm gonna bring jobs back into our Country folks, I'm gonna back into our country folks, I'm gonna back into our country folks, I'm gonna bring jobs back into our country and bring jobs back into our country and bring jobs back into our country.
And Hillary doesn't have a clue. She doesn't. Hillary doesn't have a clue. She doesn't - Hillary doesn't have a clue. She doesn't know about jobs. Remember this remember know about jobs. Remember this remember know about jobs. Remember this, remember this, her husband signed NAFTA true this her husband signed NAFTA true this her husband signed NAFTA true maybe the worst economic development, maybe the worst economic development, maybe the worst economic development transaction ever signed in the history transaction ever signed in the history transaction.
Ever signed in the history of our country, it cleaned out our of our country, it cleaned out our of our country, it cleaned out our manufacturing, um and I just won so many manufacturing, um and I just won so many manufacturing, um and I just won so Many states and I got to see these states, I states and I got to see these states, I states and I got to see these states I went all over the different states in went all over the different states in went all over the different states in Pennsylvania, New York all over the place, Pennsylvania, New York all over the place, Pennsylvania, New York all over the place.
And I got to see what NAFTA the havoc and I got to see what NAFTA the havoc. And I got to see what NAFTA the havoc that it wreaked and it's taking our jobs that it wreaked and it's taking our jobs that it wreaked and it's taking our jobs just like we're a bunch of babies like just like we're a bunch of babies like Just like we're a bunch of babies like we're a bunch of babies and moved them.
We're a bunch of babies and moved them. We're a bunch of babies and moved them to other places, honestly moved them all to other places, honestly moved them all to other places. Honestly moved them all over Mexico. We have - we have states where over Mexico we have - we have states where over Mexico we have - we have states where they say, you know, I have statisticians.
They say, you know, I have statisticians. They say, you know, I have statisticians write the world's most boring job, but write the world's most boring job, but write the world's most boring job. But yeah, we got to do it. Somebody's got to - yeah, we got to do it. Somebody's got to - yeah, we got to do it, somebody's got to do it and I get numbers where certain do it and I get numbers where certain do it and I get numbers where certain states was fifty and sixty percent of states was fifty and sixty percent Of states was fifty and sixty percent of their manufacturing jobs and you'd go their manufacturing jobs and you'd go their manufacturing jobs and you'd go upstate like upstate New York and you upstate like upstate New York and you upstate like upstate New York and you see empty Factories empty buildings, see empty factories, empty buildings, see empty factories, empty buildings, buildings that you could buy for.
Nothing buildings that you could buy for. Nothing buildings that you could buy for, nothing buildings that have been abandoned where buildings that have been abandoned where buildings that have been abandoned where they left because Bill Clinton signed, they left because Bill Clinton signed, they left because Bill Clinton signed NAFTA and it didn't affect Him so much NAFTA and it didn't affect him so much NAFTA and it didn't affect him so much because he was gone.
But boy did it because he was gone. But boy did it because he was gone. But boy, did it affect the rest of these presidents. Let affect the rest of these presidents. Let affect the rest of these presidents. Let me tell you and we're going to bring our me tell you and we're going to bring our me tell you and we're going to bring our jobs back.
We're not going to be the jobs back. We're not going to be the jobs back. We're not going to be the stupid people anymore. Folks. We're not stupid people anymore, folks. We're not stupid people anymore. Folks. We're not going to be the stupid people. So what we going to be the stupid people, so what we going to be the stupid people.
So what we have and we'll build the wall he says have and we'll build the wall he says have and we'll build the wall, he says build the wall, we're gonna build the build the wall, we're gonna build the build the wall, we're gonna Build the wall we have to wall, we have to wall, we have to - we have to - we have to - we have to - we have to - we have to - we have to look, we have no choice, we have no choice.
Look, we have no choice. We have no choice. Look, we have no choice, we have no choice. So I just got three weeks ago, I got the - so I just got three weeks ago, I got the - so I just got three weeks ago, I got the endorsement of 16,500, Border Patrol endorsement of 16,500, Border Patrol endorsement of 16,500 Border Patrol agents, 65. It's the first time, the first agents 65, it's the first time the first agents 65. It's the first time the first time they've ever endorsed a time they've ever endorsed a time they've ever endorsed a presidential candidate, okay?
And they're presidential candidate, okay? And they're presidential candidate, okay, and they're great people and by the way, their job is great people. And by the way, their job is great people. And by the way their job is much easier now stand back, don't talk much easier now stand back, don't talk much easier, now stand back, don't talk, don't do this stand back much is your don't do this stand back much, is your don't do this stand back Much is your job, they want to do their job, they see job, they want to do their job, they see job, they want to do their job.
They see what's happening to our country. They - what's happening to our country, they - what's happening to our country, they love our country, they want to do the job, love our country, they want to do the job, love our country, they want to do the job. They're not allowed to do their job. So they're not allowed to do their job, so they're not allowed to do their job.
So here's what's gonna happen and I asked here's what's gonna happen and I asked here's what's gonna happen and I asked him such incredible people. I asked him I him such incredible people, I asked him, I him such incredible people. I asked him. I said just you know I got ta be a hundred said just you know I got ta be a hundred said just you know I got ta be a hundred percent sure.
Do we need the wall well percent? Sure. Do we need the wall well percent? Sure. Do we need the wall well, you said yes, but they said yes, also I - you said yes, but they said yes, also I - you said yes, but they said yes, also I don't know what I would have done. Don't know what I would have done. Don't know what I would have done supposing they said no, I'd say, yeah, supposing they said no, I'd say, yeah, supposing they said no, I'd say, yeah, really what am I gonna do here, but I really what am I gonna do here, but I really - What am I gonna do here?
But I said do we need and they said mr. Trump said do we need and they said mr. Trump said do we need and they said mr. Trump, it is such an unbelievably important. It is such an unbelievably important. It is such an unbelievably important weapon for drugs pouring through, I mean weapon for drugs pouring through, I mean weapon for drugs pouring through.
I mean we have drugs pouring into our country. We have drugs pouring into our country. We have drugs pouring into our country. When I won New Hampshire, I love New when I won New Hampshire, I love New when I won New Hampshire, I love New Hampshire. My first victory, you know we Hampshire, my first victory, you know we Hampshire, my first victory, you know we won 37. I think I'm gonna say I have to won 37. I think I'm gonna say I have to won 37. I think I'm gonna say, I have to say I think, because if it's like 36 or say, I think, because if it's like 36 or say, I think because if it's like 36 or 35, even if it's 38 or 39, they'll correct 35. Even if it's 38 or 39, they'll correct 35, even if it's 38 or 39, they'll correct me.
But we won New Hampshire and when I me - but we won New Hampshire and when I me - but we won New Hampshire. And when I say we, we really want it, we want it this say we - we really want it, we want it this say we - we really want it, we want it. This is all about we - this is about we - we is all about - we - this is about we - we is all about - we - this is about we - we - I'll tell you folks, I didn't have to do.
I'll tell you folks, I didn't have to do. I'll tell you folks, I didn't have to do this, I didn't have to do this. This is I - this, I didn't have to do this. This is I this, I didn't have to do this. This is - I love it. I love it. I love it. But I didn't love it, I love it, I love it, but I didn't love it.
I love it. I love it. But I didn't have to do dishes like work folks this have to do dishes like work folks this have to do dishes like work folks. This is, hey, you know what is, hey, you know what is, hey, you know what yesterday was the one-year anniversary yesterday was the one-year anniversary. Yesterday was the one-year anniversary.
What I announced we're going to run what I announced we're going to run what I announced we're going to run yesterday. Oh, great, yesterday - oh, great, yesterday, oh, great. The one-year that was the one year from the one-year that was the one year from the one-year that was the one year from yesterday.
Somebody said, you know it's yesterday, somebody said, you know it's yesterday, somebody said, you know, it's June 16th, June 16th, June 16th. I said June 16th, that's when I decided I said June 16th, that's when I decided I said June 16th. That's when I decided to do this and it's been a great to do this and it's been a great to do this and it's been a great experience.
Thank you, darling. Thank you. I experience thank you, darling. Thank you. I experience thank you, darling. Thank you. I love you. I love you. I love everybody in love you. I love you. I love everybody in love you. I love you. I love everybody in this room. I love everyone in this room, this room. I love everyone in this room, this room.
I love everyone in this room and you know the amazing thing and we - and you know the amazing thing and we - and you know the amazing thing and we all love each other. These I'll tell you all love each other. These - I'll tell you all love each other. These - I'll tell you what you know, you see, oh, wow!
Somebody what you know you see, oh, wow! Somebody what you know you see, oh, wow! Somebody was protesting the safest place to be was protesting the safest place to be was protesting the safest place to be anywhere. Is that a trump rally believe anywhere? Is that a trump rally believe anywhere? Is that a trump rally, believe me the safest, one, the safest place and me the safest one, the safest place and me the safest one, the safest place.
And no matter what you say, I mean, you just - no matter what you say, I mean, you just no matter what you say, I mean, you just take a look now if there's one protestor take a look now if there's one protestor take a look now if There's one protestor that raises the hand, although I love it, that raises the hand, although I love it.
That raises the hand, although I love it. You know, the only way I get the show cuz, you know the only way I get the show cuz, you know the only way I get the show cuz nobody has crowds like we have and nobody has crowds like we have and nobody has crowds like we Have - and they'll admit that not Bernie and birdie, they'll admit that not Bernie and birdie, they'll admit that not Bernie and birdie did pretty well with the cross.
He was did pretty well with the cross. He was - did pretty well with the cross. He was second by the way a deep deep second he second by the way a deep deep second he second by the way a deep deep second. He was way back now, don't forget we agree was way back. Now, don't forget we agree was way back now.
Don't forget we agree with Bernie on one thing trade, he knows with Bernie on one thing trade, he knows with Bernie on one thing trade, he knows how bad our trade deals are. He gets it how bad our trade deals are. He gets it how bad our trade deals are, he gets it, he gets it and that's good. Now we're - he gets it and that's good.
Now we're - he gets it and that's good. Now we're trying to get Bernie's people because a trying to get Bernie's people because a trying to get Bernie's people because a lot of those, Bernie, people hate Hillary, lot of those, Bernie people hate Hillary, lot of those, Bernie people hate Hillary Clinton, crooked, Hillary, as we Call it - and of course, Bernie hates Hillary and of course, Bernie hates Hillary and of course, Bernie hates, Hillary Clinton.
We know that. That's for sure. Clinton. We know that. That's for sure. Clinton, we know that, that's for sure. One thing you got to say, he doesn't give one thing, you got to say he doesn't give one thing. You got to say he doesn't give up, she's going, is he still here is he's up, she's going, is he still here is he's up, she's going, is he still - here is - he's still here who would have thought that I still here who would have thought that I still here who would have thought that I was going to win, what, eight weeks ago it was going to win, what, eight weeks ago it was going to win.
What eight weeks ago, it was supposed to be the opposite way and was supposed to be the opposite way and was supposed to be the opposite way. And here we have it from eight weeks ago and here we have it from eight weeks ago. And here we have it from eight weeks ago and she's still out there trying to say can she's still out there trying to say can she's still out there trying to say, can we get rid of Bernie, is there any way we get rid of Bernie, is There any way we get rid of Bernie is there any way and just like she can't close that deal and just like she can't close that deal and just like she can't close that deal, folks, she won't be able to make trade folks.
She won't be able to make trade folks. She won't be able to make trade deals. She won't be able to take care of deals. She won't be able to take care of deals. She won't be able to take care of our military. Everybody's going to be our military, everybody's going to be our military. Everybody's going to be ripping us off as a country, okay?
The ripping us off as a country, okay, the ripping us off as a country, okay, the same exact way. And the same way, that - same exact way and the same way that same exact way and the same way that you're looking at it. So look, here's what you're looking at it. So look, here's what you're looking at it.
So look, here's what we have to do when I came down. Thank you. We have to do. When I came down, thank you. We have to do when I came down, thank you. When I came down, and I said I actually when I came down and I said I actually when I came down and I said I actually said, oh, I thought it was a protester, I said, oh, I thought it was a protester, I said, oh, I thought It was a protester, I said friend or foe and it was friend, said friend or foe and it was friend, said friend or foe.
And it was friend that I was disappointed because if it's that I was disappointed because if it's that I was disappointed because if it's friend, the cameras will never go there friend, the cameras will never go there friend, the cameras will never go there. So that's not good, so that's not good. So that's not good.
Thank you. That's called - that's called an thank you that's called - that's called an thank you that's called - that's called an enthusiastic friend, but just so you enthusiastic friend, but just so you enthusiastic friend, but just so you understand we've had things happen to understand. We've had things happen to understand, we've had things happen to our country, our country, our country, I mean World Trade Center.
If you look at, I mean World Trade Center, if you look at, I mean World Trade Center, if you look at what happened in California recently San what happened in California recently San, what happened in California recently, San Bernardino, you look at that, it's a Bernardino, you Look at that, it's a Bernardino, you look at that.
It's a radicalization like nobody's ever seen radicalization like nobody's ever seen radicalization like nobody's ever seen before. It's more - it's a radicalization before. It's more - it's a radicalization before. It's more - it's a radicalization, it's a hatred. It's a hatred, it's a - it's a hatred, it's a hatred.
It's a - it's a hatred, it's a hatred. It's a deep-seated hatred and President Obama. Deep-seated hatred and President Obama, deep-seated hatred and President Obama is trying to make terrorism into guns is trying to make terrorism into guns, is trying to make terrorism into guns. And it's not guns, folks, as it is not.
And it's not guns, folks, as it is not. And it's not guns, folks as it is not guns, guns, guns, it is not guns. This is terrorism and by - it is not guns. This is terrorism and by - it is not guns. This is terrorism. And by the way, the NRA came out National Rifle. The way the NRA came out National Rifle, the way the NRA came out National Rifle, as I tell you, what, they came out very, as I tell you what they came out very, as I tell you what they came out very strongly.
Probably the earliest they've strongly probably the earliest they've strongly probably the earliest they've ever done it. So the National Rifle ever done it. So the National Rifle ever done it. So the National Rifle Association endorsed Trump and those Association endorsed Trump and those Association endorsed Trump.
And those people are fantastic people, you know, people are fantastic people, you know people are fantastic people, you know they take a lot of heat, they love this, they take a lot of heat, they love this, they take a lot of heat. They love this country, they love what it represents country, they love what it represents country, they love what it represents.
They're protecting your Second Amendment. They're protecting your Second Amendment. They're protecting your Second Amendment and nobody will protect your Second and nobody will protect your Second and nobody will protect your Second Amendment Amendment Amendment like Donald. John Trump, nobody, nobody like Donald.
John Trump, nobody, nobody like Donald. John Trump, nobody, nobody, nobody. And remember this Hillary Clinton wants and remember this, Hillary Clinton wants and remember this Hillary Clinton wants to abolish the Second Amendment to abolish the Second Amendment to abolish the Second Amendment. Essentially, she wants to abolish the - essentially she wants to abolish the - essentially she wants to abolish the Second Amendment, Second Amendment, Second Amendment.
She wants to take your guns away and you - she wants to take your guns away and you she wants to take your guns away. And you see things like we saw over the weekend. See things like we saw over the weekend see things like we saw over the weekend. Remember this, if you had some of those, remember this, if you had some of those, remember this, if you had some of those incredible young people that were so incredible young people that were so incredible young people that were so brutally killed over the weekend or brutally Killed over the weekend or brutally killed over the weekend or people in Paris where you have the people in Paris where you have the people in Paris where you have the toughest gun laws in the world in Paris.
Toughest gun laws in the world in Paris, toughest gun laws in the world, in Paris, in France, in Paris, you have the toughest in France. In Paris, you have the toughest in France. In Paris, you have the toughest gun laws in the world hundred and thirty gun laws in the world hundred and thirty gun laws in the world hundred and thirty killed wounded still in the hospital.
Killed wounded still in the hospital, killed wounded still in the hospital devastated. They'll never be the same devastated. They'll never be the same devastated. They'll never be the same just horribly wounded same thing in San, just horribly wounded same thing in San, just horribly wounded same thing in San Bernardino.
Same thing in our military Bernardino, same thing in our military Bernardino, same thing in our military base where we had five unbelievable base where we had five unbelievable base where we had five unbelievable soldiers. One of them was a world-class soldiers. One of them was a world-class soldiers, one of them was a world-class marksman.
It was a gun-free zone. You know marksman it was a gun-free zone. You know marksman it was a gun-free zone. You know a gun-free zone. Often time means carnage a gun-free zone. Often time means carnage a gun-free zone, often time means carnage because let's call them the enemy, which because let's call them the enemy, which because let's call them the enemy, which is what they are and we should declare is what they are and we should declare is What they are and we should declare war on Isis, we should declare war on war on Isis.
We should declare war on war on Isis. We should declare war on ISIL war. It's war, its war and they're war, it's war, its war and they're war. It's war. Its war and they're poisoning or they are poisoning our poisoning or they are poisoning our poisoning or they are poisoning our youth through the internet.
They're youth through the internet. They're youth through the internet. They're getting people to go over there. The getting people to go over there, the getting people to go over there, the press calls, these people masterminds at press calls, these people masterminds at press calls, these people masterminds at the top level.
They're not masterminds the top level. They're not masterminds the top level. They're not masterminds folks, they're thugs folks. They're thugs folks, they're thugs, there's sick people and we've got to put - there's sick people and we've got to put - there's sick people and we've got to put an end to it.
And if we don't, we're not an end to it. And if we don't, we're not an end to it. And if we don't, we're not gonna have a country left anymore, gonna have a country left anymore, gonna have a country left anymore, we're not going to have a country. So. So we're not going to have a country. So. So we're not going to have a country so.
So we're gonna get very tough. Our military, we're gonna get very tough. Our military, we're gonna get very tough. Our military is depleted, badly depleted. You see that is depleted, badly depleted. You see that is depleted, badly depleted. You see that nobody better than our military people, nobody better than our military people.
Nobody better than our military people. Nobody better than our vets look at the nobody better than our vets look at the nobody better than our vets look at the way our vets are being taken care of way our vets are being taken care of way our vets are being taken care of. We're going to take care of our vets.
We're going to take care of our vets. We're going to take care of our vets folks whose event we're going to take folks whose event we're going to take folks whose event we're going to take care of our vets care of our vets care of our vets, they wait online. These are great people. They wait online, these are great people, they wait online.
These are great. People are greatest people, they wait on line are greatest people, they wait on line are greatest people. They wait on line four, five, six and seven days and they four, five, six and seven days. And they four, five, six and seven days and they die, they die waiting to see a doctor for die.
They die, waiting to see a doctor for die. They die, waiting to see a doctor for a routine ailment, a routine ailment and a routine ailment, a routine ailment and a routine ailment, a routine ailment and they're waiting five, six, seven days and they're waiting five, six, seven days and they're waiting five, six, seven days.
And you see what's happening, you see what's - you see, what's happening, you see what's - you see, what's happening. You see what's happening. It's like Hillary, it's a happening. It's like Hillary, it's a happening. It's like Hillary, it's a corrupt Enterprise, okay? It's a corrupt corrupt Enterprise, okay?
It's a corrupt corrupt Enterprise, okay. It's a corrupt Enterprise and we're going to straighten Enterprise and we're going to straighten Enterprise and we're going to straighten that out. We're going to make sure they that out. We're going to make sure they that out. We're going to make sure they get very quick and very good care and if get very quick and very good care and if get very quick and very good care.
And if they can't see a doctor, we're gonna have - they can't see a doctor. We're gonna have - they can't see a doctor, we're gonna have them go across the street to a hospital, them go across the street to a hospital, them go across the street to a hospital to a private doctor, to a public hospital to a private doctor.
To a public hospital to a private doctor to a public hospital, who cares and we're going to pay the who cares and we're going to pay the who cares and we're going to pay the bill, bill, bill, we're gonna pay that bill and you know we're Gon na pay that bill and you know we're gonna pay that bill and you know what that's less expensive by the way what that's less expensive by the way what that's less expensive by the way that's less expensive than what we're - that's less expensive than what We're - that's less expensive than what we're doing right now and you look at the doing right now and you look at the doing right now and you look at the number of deaths, so we're going to take number of deaths.
So we're going to take number of deaths, so we're going to take care very much. So we're going to take care very much. So we're going to take care very much. So we're going to take care of our veterans and that's - and I'm care of our veterans and that's - and I'm care of our veterans and that's - and I'm the one for the first time in decades, the one for the first time in decades, the one for the First time in decades, our veterans are going to be treated, our veterans are going to be treated, our veterans are going to be treated like they should be treated.
They're like they should be treated, they're like they should be treated, they're going to be treated great. Well, my going to be treated great, well, my going to be treated great, well, my friends, my friends, so I have in the friends my friends, so I have in the friends my friends. So I have in the front row and I just see some of the front row and I just see some of the front row and I just see some of the greatest people, some of the greatest greatest people, some of the greatest.
Greatest people, some of the greatest people, these are people who lost loved people. These are people who lost loved people. These are people who lost loved ones, either my friends. These are my ones, either my friends. These are my ones, either my friends, these are my friends and they called me right after friends and they called me right after friends and they called me right after my announcement then they said thank you.
My announcement then they said thank you. My announcement then they said, thank you, mr. Trump, nobody else has thought of mr. Trump. Nobody else has thought of mr. Trump. Nobody else has thought of them. These are people that lost loved them. These are people that lost loved them. These are people that lost loved ones to people that should not have been ones to people that should not have been ones to people that should not have been in the country.
And I want to just thank in the country and I want to just thank in the country and I want to just thank you all your sweethearts. Thank you. Thank you all your sweethearts. Thank you. Thank you all your sweethearts. Thank you. Thank you, darling. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you, darling. Thank you. Thank you.
Thank you, darling. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Look at the sign, hold that up. Look, you look at the sign, hold that up. Look, you look at the sign, hold that up, look at that sign, Wow! Whoa, gays for Trump at that sign, Wow! Whoa gays for Trump at that sign, Wow! Whoa gays for Trump gays well. Look, Hillary Clinton crooked well look, Hillary Clinton, crooked well.
Look, Hillary Clinton, crooked Hillary takes tens of millions of Hillary takes tens of millions of Hillary takes tens of millions of dollars into her foundation. Foundation dollars into her foundation. Foundation dollars into her foundation foundation takes tens of millions of dollars from takes tens of millions of dollars from takes tens of millions of dollars from countries that kill gays and that countries that kill gays and that countries that kill gays and that enslave women and I Will tell you I am enslave women and I will tell you I am enslave women and I will tell you I am far better for women.
I am far better for far better for women. I am far better for far better for women. I am far better for gays and now she wants people from these and now she wants people from these and now she wants people from these countries to come into the United States countries to come into the United States, countries to come into the United States.
And I was saying at a 500 percent and I was saying at a 500 percent and I was saying at a 500 percent greater clip than Obama and the press greater clip than Obama and the press greater clip than Obama. And the press said, I was wrong said, I was wrong said, I was wrong. Guess what it was five hundred and fifty guess what it was five hundred and fifty guess what it was five hundred and fifty percent, it was more five hundred and percent.
It was more five hundred and percent it was more five hundred and fifty percent more than Obama coming in fifty percent more than Obama coming in fifty percent more than Obama coming in. And many of these countries, they want to and many of these countries they want to and many of these countries, they want to kill gays and they enslave women and kill gays and they enslave women and kill gays.
And they enslave women. And Hillary Clinton want some pouring in, you Hillary Clinton want some pouring in, you Hillary Clinton want some pouring in. You tell me who's better for gays, who is, tell me who's better for gays, who is, tell me who's better for gays, who is better, tell me who is better for women, better tell me who is better for women, better tell me who is better for women Who is better for women who is better for women, who is better for women and what happened to the LGBT community and what happened to the LGBT community and what happened to the LGBT community over the weekend, what happened there over the weekend?
What happened there over the weekend, what happened there? And remember this - remember this before and remember this, remember this before and remember this, remember this before we get off to the next subject, which is we get off to the next subject, which is we get off to the next subject, which is going to be a Very interesting subject going to be a very interesting subject, going to be a very interesting subject for you folks for you folks for you folks, but don't we feel bad for them 10, 15, 20, but don't we feel bad for them 10, 15, 20. But don't we feel bad for them 10, 15, 20, how many people are outside press, how - how many people are outside press, how - how many people are outside press, how many is it 10,000 or 20,000? Because I'll many is it 10,000 or 20,000 because I'll many is it 10,000 or 20,000, because I'll tell you what I think is closer to 20, tell you what I think is closer to 20, tell you what I think is closer to 20 anyway anyway.
Anyway. If we had - if we had anyway anyway anyway, if we had - if we had anyway anyway anyway, if we had - if we had people where the bullets were going in people where the bullets were going in people where the bullets were going in the opposite direction, right Smack the opposite direction, right smack the opposite direction, right smack between the eyes of this maniac if some of those wonderful people had, if some of those wonderful people had, if some of those wonderful people had guns strapped right here, right to their guns strapped right here, Right to their guns, strapped right here, right to their waist or right to their ankle and this waist or right to their ankle and this waist or right to their ankle.
And this son of a bitch comes out and starts son of a bitch comes out and starts son of a bitch comes out and starts shooting and one of the people in that room and one of the people in that room and one of the people in That room happened to have it and goes boom boom happened to have it and goes boom boom happened to have it and goes boom, boom you know what that would have been a, you know what that would have been a, you know what that would have been A beautiful, beautiful sight folks that beautiful, beautiful sight folks that beautiful, beautiful sight folks that would have been a beautiful, beautiful, would have been a beautiful, beautiful, would have been a beautiful, beautiful sight.
So don't let them take your guns away. So don't let them take your guns away, so don't let them take your guns away and believe me and believe me and believe me, you put me in there, we're going to save - you put me in there, we're going to save - you put me in there, we're Going to save that Second Amendment, we're going to that Second Amendment, we're going to that Second Amendment.
We're going to save your guns. They're not going to take - save your guns. They're not going to take - save your guns. They're not going to take away your bullets. They're not going to away your bullets. They're not going to away your bullets. They're not going to shorten up your magazines. They're not shorten up your magazines.
They're not shorten up your magazines. They're not going to do anything. We're going to going to do anything. We're going to going to do anything. We're going to preserve it and we're going to cherish, preserve it and we're going to cherish, preserve it and we're going to cherish it and that's what we have to do.
Now remember this, so we have a - I love now remember this. So we have a, I love now remember this. So we have a, I love you look at this guys, keep shouting, he you look at this guys, keep shouting, he you look at this guys, keep shouting, he loves you, love me, right, loves you, love me, right, loves you, love me, right?
Okay. Hey, you know what, he's a guy, but I - okay. Hey, you know what, he's a guy, but I - okay. Hey, you know what, he's a guy, but I love him. Okay? He's a guy, but I love him, love him. Okay? He's a guy, but I love him. Love him. Okay, he's a guy, but I love him, that's cool man. All right. So look, we - that's cool, man.
All right. So look, we - that's cool, man. All right. So look, we have a lot of things happening. One of have a lot of things happening. One of have a lot of things happening. One of the things is by circumstance we lost a - the things is by circumstance we lost a, the things is by circumstance. We lost a great Justice Scalia and on the Supreme great Justice Scalia and on the Supreme great Justice Scalia and on the Supreme Court, we're going to have probably three Court.
We're going to have probably three Court. We're going to have probably three picks, but it could be for it, it could picks, but it could be for it, it could picks, but it could be for it, it could even be five. It could be a record in the even be five. It could be a record in the - even be five. It could be a record in the history of the Supreme Court for a history of the Supreme Court for a history of the Supreme Court for a four-year term.
And if Hillary gets in four-year term and if Hillary gets in four-year term and if Hillary gets in there and puts these horrendous picks in there and puts these horrendous picks in there and puts these horrendous picks in the Supreme Court folks, we are like the Supreme Court folks, we are like the Supreme Court folks, we are like Venezuela, you see what's happening to Venezuela, you see what's happening to Venezuela, you see what's happening to Venezuela, right?
You see what's happening Venezuela, right, you see what's happening Venezuela, right, you see what's happening. We will be a large scale version of - we will be a large scale version of - we will be a large scale version of Venezuela and it's not going to be Venezuela and it's not going to be Venezuela and it's not going to be pretty one of the Reasons, I hope you pretty - one of the reasons I hope you pretty one of the reasons I hope you with me and I know every is there with me and I know every is there with me and I know every is there anybody in this room that's Not going to anybody in this room that's not going to anybody in this room that's not going to vote for Trump.
Just out of curiosity vote for Trump, just out of curiosity vote for Trump, just out of curiosity, nobody, Wow, USA, u.s., amazing, amazing, okay, so ready. So one of amazing, amazing, okay, so ready. So one of amazing, amazing, okay, so ready. So one of the most look, defense is always the most the most look, defense is always the most, the most look, defense is always the most important, right?
You know defense is important, right? You know defense is important, right? You know, defense is always, but I will pick great smart always, but I will pick great smart always, but I will pick great, smart, brilliant, conservative intellects, great, brilliant, conservative intellects, great, brilliant, conservative intellects, great judges.
And what I've done is we went to judges and what I've done is we went to judges and what I've done is we went to the Federalist Society where they really - the Federalist Society, where they really - the Federalist Society, where they really - and also with the auspices Of heritage and also with the auspices of heritage and also with the auspices of heritage, which is a great group and we picked which is a great group and we picked which is a great group and we picked eleven judges, we're going to probably eleven judges.
We're going to probably eleven judges, we're going to probably put three or four more on there, but we put three or four more on there, but we put three or four more on there. But we picked eleven great, great judges and I picked eleven great, great judges and I picked eleven great, great judges. And I said from this group or very similar to said from this group or very similar to said from this group or very similar to this group.
We are going to pick judges this group. We are going to pick judges this group. We are going to pick judges for the United States Supreme Court and for the United States Supreme Court and for the United States Supreme Court. And you're going to be proud of those judges you're going to be proud of those judges you're going to be proud of those judges and they're going to be terrific and they're going to be terrific and they're going to be terrific, hopefully very much in the mold Of judge hopefully very much in the mold of judge, hopefully very much in the mold of judge Scalia, that's what we want to do, okay?
So - so I just think it's so important. The - so I just think it's so important. The - so I just think it's so important, the defense of our country, we have to build defense of our country. We have to build defense of our country. We have to build up our military. We have to take care of up our military.
We have to take care of up our military, we have to take care of our vets. We have to do all these things. Our vets, we have to do all these things. Our vets, we have to do all these things, but we have to pick great justices for, but we have to pick great justices for, but we have to pick great justices for the Supreme Court.
And if we don't, we're the Supreme Court and if we don't, we're the Supreme Court. And if we don't, we're not going to have a country anymore, not going to have a country anymore, not going to have a country anymore. We're not going to have a country. So we're not going to have a country, so we're not going to have a country.
So it's so important and a lot of people, it's so important and a lot of people, it's so important and a lot of people forget they say, oh, well, this and that. So forget they say, oh, well, this and that so forget they say, oh, well, this and that. So important, one of the most important important - one of the most important important - one of the most important things, okay, so ready things.
Okay, so ready things, okay, so ready, we need borders, right. We need borders, we - we need borders, right, we need borders, we - we need borders, right, we need borders, we need four and he was saying just a need four and he was saying just a need four. And he was saying just a little while ago of the wall and we're little while ago of the wall and we're little while ago of the wall and we're gonna have the wall and we're gonna have gonna have the wall and we're gonna Have gonna have the wall and we're gonna have a war, it's gonna be such a beautiful, a war, it's gonna be such a beautiful, a war, it's gonna be such a beautiful wall.
It's going to be so big. It's going wall. It's going to be so big, it's going wall, it's going to be so big. It's going to be so powerful. It's going to be as to be so powerful. It's going to be as to be so powerful. It's going to be as beautiful as a wall can be. I've got to make it beautiful because I've got to make it beautiful because I've got to make it beautiful because maybe someday they'll name the wall, the maybe someday they'll name the wall, the maybe someday they'll name the wall.
The truckball who the hell knows who the truckball, who the hell knows who the truckball, who the hell knows who the hell knows. But folks, we have to have it, hell knows, but folks we have to have it, hell knows. But folks we have to have it. And the Border Patrol said, mr. Trump, you and the Border Patrol said, mr.
Trump, you and the Border Patrol said mr. Trump, you need it. Look, here's the story, need it. Look, here's the story, need it. Look, here's the story. We need borders, we don't have borders. We need borders, we don't have borders, we need borders, we don't have borders right now. We need borders. We either have right now we need borders.
We either have - right now, we need borders, we either have a country or we don't - we don't have a country or we don't. We don't have a country or we don't. We don't have borders. We don't have a country borders. We don't have a country borders. We don't have a country, all right, and people are pouring in and all right, and people are pouring in and all right?
And people are pouring in and we need this, but we also needed it for - we need this, but we also needed it for - we need this, but we also needed it for drugs. When I was up in New Hampshire, I drugs when I was up in New Hampshire, I drugs when I was up in New Hampshire, I was going to say I spent a great deal of - was going to say I spent a great deal of - was going to Say I spent a great deal of time there and I got to know the people time there and I got to know the people time there and I got to know the people and it's a beautiful state uncredible and it's a beautiful state uncredible and it's a Beautiful state uncredible, the beautiful lakes and rivers and the beautiful lakes and rivers and the beautiful lakes and rivers and roadways and the trees and everything, roadways and the trees and everything, roadways and the trees and everything.
And I'd sit with a group and I'd say, and I'd sit with a group and I'd say, and I'd sit with a group and I'd say what's the big problem in New Hampshire? What's the big problem in New Hampshire? What's the big problem in New Hampshire? They said heroin, I said heroin it, they said heroin, I said heroin it, they said heroin, I said heroin, it doesn't work.
I mean it doesn't fit with, doesn't work. I mean it doesn't fit with, doesn't work. I mean it doesn't fit with everything. The beauty and it turned out everything, the beauty and it turned out everything the beauty and it turned out to be a massive, massive, massive problem to be a massive, massive, massive problem to be a massive, massive, massive problem for the New Hampshire.
And then I went to for the New Hampshire and then I went to for the New Hampshire and then I went to South Carolina, I went to Massachusetts, I - South Carolina, I went to Massachusetts, I, South Carolina, I went to Massachusetts, I went all over the place. No matter where went all over the place, no matter where went all over the place, no matter where I went, I went - I went heroin and drugs at pour across the heroin and drugs at pour across the heroin and drugs at pour across the southern border.
And I said to the people southern border and I said to the people southern border and I said to the people of New Hampshire, my first victory I love of New Hampshire. My first victory I love of New Hampshire. My first victory, I love them, I love them. I said to the people of them, I love them. I said to the people of them, I love them.
I said to the people of New Hampshire, look, if I get elected New Hampshire, look, if I get elected New Hampshire, look, if I get elected, we're gonna solve, you're probably going - we're gonna solve, you're probably going - we're gonna solve, you're probably going to Try and get your youth and it's not to try and get your youth and it's not to try and get your youth.
And it's not only youth, it's beyond youth, but we're only youth, it's beyond youth, but we're only youth, it's beyond youth. But we're going to try and get people help them going to try and get people, help them going to try and get people help them. We're gonna help them. We got to make - we're gonna help them.
We got to make - we're gonna help them. We got to make them better, we got to get them off it them better. We got to get them off it them better. We got to get them off it. It's not easy, it's not easy. It's not easy. We're gonna work like hell to get them. We're gonna work like hell to get them. We're gonna work like hell to get them off.
This horrible stuff that's flowing off. This horrible stuff that's flowing off. This horrible stuff that's flowing in and it's cheaper than candy, it's in and it's cheaper than candy. It's in - and it's cheaper than candy. It's cheaper than candy because there's so cheaper than candy because there's so cheaper than candy because there's so much of it.
It pours in because our much of it, it pours in because our much of it it pours in because our leadership, our president doesn't have a leadership. Our president doesn't have a leadership. Our president doesn't have a damn clue what the hell he's doing and damn clue what the hell he's doing and damn clue what the hell he's doing.
And our youth are. Our youth are our youth, are being poisoned, they're being poisoned and the war will be done. And you know, and the war will be done and you know, and the war will be done. And you know, interestingly when I was talking to interestingly when I was talking to interestingly when I was talking to certain politicians, they said you don't certain politicians.
They said you don't certain politicians, they said you don't really build the wall. I mean you can't really build the wall. I mean you can't really build the wall. I mean you can't really build a wall well, we have 2,000 really build a wall well. We have 2,000 really build a wall well, we have 2,000 miles.
We actually need 1,000 even less miles. We actually need 1,000 even less miles. We actually need 1,000 even less than that because we have a lot of than that because we have a lot of than that because we have a lot of natural barriers, right, big strong natural barriers, right, big strong natural barriers, right, big strong, wonderful natural barriers.
So we need a wonderful natural barriers, so we need a wonderful natural barriers. So we need a thousand miles. The Great Wall of China thousand miles, the Great Wall of China thousand miles, the Great Wall of China is 13,000 miles long and it was built is 13,000 miles long and it was built is 13,000 miles long and it was built 2,000 years ago, folks 2,000 years Ago 2,000 years ago, folks, 2,000 years ago, 2,000 years ago, folks, 2,000 years ago and they didn't have caterpillar and they didn't have caterpillar and they didn't have caterpillar tractors.
Just so you understand you know, tractors just so you understand you know, tractors. Just so you understand, you know to the best of my knowledge, they didn't to the best of my knowledge, they didn't to the best of my knowledge they didn't have and we will not use Komatsu. We will have and we will not use Komatsu.
We will have and we will not use Komatsu, we will use caterpillar, okay, we will use them, use caterpillar, okay. We will use them, use caterpillar, okay. We will use them not easy come on. You know I used to tell not easy come on. You know, I used to tell not easy come on, you know, I used to tell the story and I could see what was the story and I could see what was the story and I could see what was happening.
I don't know if you saw two happening. I don't know if you saw two happening, I don't know if you saw two days ago was announced that our trade days ago was announced that our trade days ago was announced that our trade deficit, our trade deficit is the largest deficit. Our trade deficit is the largest deficit.
Our trade deficit is the largest that's been in seven years, okay. Now that's been in seven years, okay. Now that's been in seven years, okay. Now think of that house it and Here I am think of that house it and Here I am think of that house it. And Here I am four years saying our trade or trade. Our four years saying our trade or trade.
Our four years saying our trade or trade, our trade and the arrogance they don't trade and the arrogance they don't trade and the arrogance they don't listen, they don't listen to me. They have - listen, they don't listen to me. They have - listen, they don't listen to me. They have to listen to me right, because I'm to listen to me right, because I'm to listen to me right, because I'm representing a lot of people folks.
So we representing a lot of people folks. So we representing a lot of people folks. So we have the largest trade deficit we've had have the largest trade deficit we've had have the largest trade deficit we've had in many, many years. And I'm - that's why I in many, many years and I'm - that's why I in many, many years and I'm - that's why I mentioned the name Komatsu, right and a mentioned the name Komatsu, right and a mentioned the name Komatsu, right and a friend of mine.
This is two years ago now friend of mine. This is two years ago now friend of mine. This is two years ago. Now I used to tell this to - I haven't told it, I used to tell this to - I haven't told it, I used to tell this to - I haven't told it, but he's an excavator, a great excavator. But he's an excavator, a great excavator.
But he's an excavator. A great excavator big and I see him and he's very sad and big and I see him and he's very sad and big and I see him and he's very sad and I say why he sad. He's a rough guy. I say why he sad. He's a rough guy. I say why he sad. He's a rough guy, doesn't get too sad, but he gets sad.
He's doesn't get too sad, but he gets sad. He's doesn't get too sad, but he gets sad. He's rough rough, rough. Most excavators are pretty rough right. Most excavators are pretty rough, right, most excavators are pretty rough, right? You know, these are not - these are not - you know, these are not - these are not - you know, these are not - these are not babies, but let's say this, he's a sad as babies, but let's say this, he's a sad as babies, but let's say this, he's a Sad as an excavator can be right, but he said to an excavator can be right, but he said to an excavator can be right.
But he said to me, Donald, I just ordered Komatsu's, he me Donald, I just ordered Komatsu's, he me Donald, I just ordered Komatsu's. He said really why he said because Japan said really why he said because Japan said really why he said because Japan has devalued there has devalued there, has devalued there currency to such an extent and he always currency to such an extent and he always currency to Such an extent and he always bought caterpillar tractors, his whole bought caterpillar tractors, his whole bought caterpillar tractors, his whole life, he bought Caterpillar and they life.
He bought Caterpillar and they life. He bought Caterpillar and they couldn't compete only for one reason, couldn't compete only for one reason, couldn't compete only for one reason because Japan has brilliantly devalued because Japan has brilliantly devalued because Japan has brilliantly devalued, the value devalued and he went on, made a the value Devalued and he went on, made a - the value devalued and he went on, made a very, very large order of Komatsu.
I say very, very large order of Komatsu. I say very, very large order of Komatsu. I say, are they as good? He said no, but they're - are they as good? He said no. But they're - are they as good? He said no. But they're very good. They're very good, high-quality, very good. They're very good, high-quality, very good.
They're very good, high-quality equipment, not as good but good enough equipment. Not as good but good enough equipment, not as good, but good enough and quite good. And I said so what do you and quite good and I said, so what do you and quite good and I said, so what do you think? He said our country's in trouble think he said our country's in trouble think he said our country's in trouble.
And I started telling this story two and I started telling this story two and I started telling this story two years ago. And if you think about it, I years ago and if you think about it, I years ago and if you think about it, I really predicted exactly what was going really predicted exactly what was going really predicted exactly what was going to happen because look at what's Going to happen because look at what's going to happen because look at what's going on, we're losing our jobs like crazy the on we're losing our jobs like crazy the on we're losing our jobs like crazy.
The reason I want Indiana was largely well reason I want Indiana was largely well reason I want Indiana was largely well was because of Bobby Knight. I mean Bobby was because of Bobby Knight, I mean Bobby was because of Bobby Knight, I mean Bobby Knight, you know Bobby Knight and some Knight, you know Bobby Knight and some Knight, you know Bobby Knight and some other great folks.
I want to tell you and other great folks I want to tell you and other great folks I want to tell you and I think we would have one very big, I think we would have one very big - I think we would have one very big anyway. But boy, did we win in a big anyway, but boy, did we win in a big anyway. But boy, did we win in a big landslide.
But you know what that was landslide. But you know what that was landslide. But you know what that was right in the time when everybody was right in the time when everybody was right in the time when everybody was talking about carrier Air Conditioner, talking about carrier Air Conditioner, talking about carrier Air Conditioner, moving to Mexico, firing 1,400 people.
And moving to Mexico, firing 1,400 people and moving to Mexico, firing 1,400 people and those people were following me around those. People were following me around those. People were following me around that week in Indiana. They came from that week in Indiana. They came from that week in Indiana. They came from Indianapolis and Cary had a big plant.
Indianapolis and Cary had a big plant. Indianapolis and Cary had a big plant and they said we're closing at folks who - and they said we're closing at folks who - and they said we're closing at folks who remember was owned all over television. Remember was owned all over television. Remember was owned all over television.
We're closing it, we're moving to Mexico, we're closing it. We're moving to Mexico, we're closing it. We're moving to Mexico now. I don't blame Mexico now. I don't blame Mexico now. I don't blame Mexico. I don't blame Mexico and I don't blame - I don't blame Mexico and I don't blame, I don't blame Mexico and I don't blame China for ripping us off and they are China for ripping us off and they are China for ripping us off and they are ripping Us big league, right, biggest ripping us, big league, right, biggest ripping us, big league, right, biggest trade deficits in the history of the trade deficits in the history of the trade deficits in the history of the world with China, we have rebuilt China, I world with China.
We have rebuilt China, I world with China, we have rebuilt China. I don't hold it against them at all, not don't hold it against them at all, not don't hold it against them at all. Not all. I don't hold it against China. I all - I don't hold it against China, I all - I don't hold it against China. I don't hold it against Japan.
I don't hold, don't hold it against Japan. I don't hold, don't hold it against Japan. I don't hold it against Mexico or Vietnam or India or it against Mexico or Vietnam or India or it against Mexico or Vietnam or India or any other country that's killing us on any other country that's killing us on any other country that's killing us on trade.
That's taking our jobs trade, that's taking our jobs trade, that's taking our jobs. I don't hold it against them. I hold it. I don't hold it against them. I hold it. I don't hold it against them. I hold it against our leaders for being grossly against our leaders for being grossly against our leaders for being grossly incompetent incompetent, incompetent incompetent and when they want to take incompetent and when they want to take incompetent and when they want to take our companies out of Our country there, our companies out of our country there, our companies out of our country there is going to be a price to be paid is going to be a price to be paid is going to be a price to be paid.
There's going to be consequences. No more there's going to be consequences, no more. There's going to be consequences, no more folks, no more, no more, no more empty folks, no more, no more, no more empty folks, no more, no more, no more empty factories that sit there and rot like factories that sit there and rot like factories that sit there.
And rot, like all over Pennsylvania, all over New York, all over Pennsylvania, all over New York, all over Pennsylvania, all over New York State all over Maryland. I'm looking at State all over Maryland. I'm looking at State all over Maryland. I'm looking at these places. You wouldn't believe what these places - you wouldn't believe what these places you wouldn't believe what you're seeing.
And you could see 2025, you're seeing and you could see 2025, you're seeing and you could see 2025 years ago, years ago, years ago, thriving, thriving enterprises and now thriving, thriving enterprises and now thriving, thriving enterprises. And now they're rotted from the water and from - they're rotted from the water and from - they're rotted from the water and from the wind.
So we're going to do things, the wind. So we're going to do things, the wind. So we're going to do things folks and we're gonna be the smart folks and we're gonna be the smart folks and we're gonna be the smart people again, you know a lot of the people again, you know a lot of the people again, you Know a lot of the Republicans have said to me and they Republicans have said to me and they Republicans have said to me and they said, you know, you're not conservative said, you know, you're not conservative said, you know, you're not conservative.
And the reason I imitate somebody said and the reason I imitate somebody said and the reason I imitate somebody said you are not a conservative because you - you are not a conservative because you - you are not a conservative because you don't believe in free trade, ok. Who cares, don't believe in free trade, ok, who cares?
Don't believe in free trade, ok, who cares? Let me tell you folks, number one, I'm a - let me tell you folks. Number one, I'm a - let me tell you folks. Number one, I'm a Republican. Number two, I happen to be I Republican. Number two, I happen to be I Republican. Number two, I happen to be - I happen to be conservative but - but more happen to be conservative but - but more happen to be conservative.
But but more importantly I was asked by one of the importantly I was asked by one of the importantly, I was asked by one of the network's recently. So what is your network's recently? So what is your network's recently? So what is your status, you know, to be a conservative status, you know, to be a conservative status, you know, to be a conservative Azote you're supposed to believe in free Azote you're supposed to believe in free Azote you're supposed to believe in free trade goes across The border, but we trade goes across the border, but we trade goes across the border, but we don't have free trade.
People think we do, don't have free trade. People think we do, don't have free trade. People think we do because there's stupid people. We don't because there's stupid people, we don't because there's stupid people we don't have free trade with China with China, have free trade with China, with China have free trade with China, with China, they dump their product all over the - they dump their product all over the - They dump their product all over the place.
They're dumping steals and ruining place. They're dumping steals and ruining place. They're dumping steals and ruining our steel mills. They're ruining our - our steel mills, they're ruining our - our steel mills, they're ruining our steel mills. Obama is closing up, our coal steel mills, Obama is closing up, our coal steel mills, Obama is closing up our coal miners in our minds.
So you got - you got miners in our minds. So you got - you got miners in our minds. So you got, you got miners all over the place and you know. Miners all over the place and you know, miners all over the place and you know what? I went into West Virginia, what I went into West Virginia, what I went into West Virginia.
We won West Virginia in a landslide. We won West Virginia in a landslide. We won West Virginia in a landslide because the miners know that I'm going because the miners know that I'm going because the miners know that I'm going to put the miners back to work. We're to put the miners back to work. We're to put the miners back to work.
We're going to put the steel workers back to going to put the steel workers back to going to put the steel workers back to work work work. We're going to put them back to work and we're going to put them back to work and we're going to put them back to work and we're going to put them back fast. But I - we're going to put them back fast.
But I - we're going to put them back fast, but I don't blame these countries. What I do is don't blame these countries. What I do is don't blame these countries. What I do is I blame our inadequate leadership and I blame our inadequate leadership and I blame our inadequate leadership. And it's almost hard to believe that this - it's almost hard to believe that this - it's almost hard to believe that this could be happening.
When you look at - could be happening when you look at - could be happening when you look at what's going on with our country now what's going on with our country now, what's going on with our country. Now here's what we're going to do. Let's take - here's what we're going to do. Let's take - here's what we're going to do.
Let's take the clay and I could talk about Ford, the clay, and I could talk about Ford, the clay, and I could talk about Ford. I can talk about carrier. I can talk - I can talk about carrier, I can talk, I can talk about carrier. I can talk about hundreds of different companies, about hundreds of different companies, about hundreds of different companies that are no longer here, then no longer that are no longer here, then no longer that are no longer here, then no longer here.
And here's the story. Folks. I here and here's the story folks I here and here's the story. Folks, I believe in free trade, ok, that's official believe in free trade, ok, that's official believe in free trade. Ok, that's official, but here's the problem with free trade. But here's the problem with free trade, but here's the problem with free trade.
We need smart leaders to make free trade. We need smart leaders to make free trade. We need smart leaders to make free trade work and we have leaders that are not work. And we have leaders that are not work and we have leaders that are not smart. In fact, they're rather stupid. I smart. In fact, they're rather stupid.
I smart. In fact, they're rather stupid. I must say they're rather swill. So I was asked in a program the other, so I was asked in a program the other, so I was asked in a program the other day recently they said do you believe in day recently they said do you believe in day recently they said, do you Believe in free trade, I said, yeah, I do.
Do you free trade, I said, yeah, I do. Do you free trade, I said, yeah, I do. Do you believe in fair trade? Yeah, I do believe in fair trade. Yeah, I do believe in fair trade. Yeah, I do I believe in trade well what kind of I believe in trade, well, what kind of I believe in trade, well, what kind of trade do you like the best?
I said here's trade. Do you like the best? I said, here's trade. Do you like the best? I said, here's my trade, I want to make great deals. My trade, I want to make great deals. My trade, I want to make great deals. That's what it is for the people for - that's what it is for the people for - that's what it is for the people for this country.
I don't care if it's free this country. I don't care if it's free this country. I don't care if it's free trade. I don't care if it's fair, it trade, I don't care if it's fair, it trade, I don't care if it's fair, it doesn't make any difference, doesn't make any difference, doesn't make any difference.
I want my trade deal, I want to make good, I want my trade deal. I want to make good, I want my trade deal. I want to make good deals for you and I have the greatest deals for you and I have the greatest deals for you. And I have the greatest negotiators in the world. We have Carl negotiators in the world.
We have Carl negotiators in the world. We have Carl Icahn, I've gotten endorsed by the big Icahn. I've gotten endorsed by the big Icahn. I've gotten endorsed by the big business leaders. They love Trump what business leaders they love Trump what business leaders, they love Trump, what can I tell you, but I have such great.
Can I tell you, but I have such great. Can I tell you, but I have such great endorsements. I have. We have the greatest endorsements I have. We have the greatest endorsements. I have. We have the greatest negotiators in the world, in our country, negotiators in the world, in our country, negotiators in the world, in our country and we don't use them to make these and we don't use them to make these and we don't use them to make these Deals that are bigger than any company's deals that are bigger than any company's deals that are bigger than any company's deals.
These are the biggest deals, deals, deals, these are the biggest deals, deals, deals. These are the biggest deals, deals with China, deals with Japan and Mexico with China deals with Japan and Mexico with China deals with Japan and Mexico. These are the biggest deals in the world. These are the biggest deals in the world.
These are the biggest deals in the world, folks and we use political lightweights, folks and we use political lightweights, folks and we use political lightweights, political hacks that don't know what political hacks that don't know what political hacks that don't know what they're doing. And China looks at us and they're doing - and China looks at us and they're doing and China looks at us and they can't believe how stupid we are.
They can't believe how stupid we are. They can't believe how stupid we are. They can't believe they get away with it. They can't believe they get away with it. They can't believe they get away with it for years. It's amazing that the country for years, it's amazing that the country for years, it's amazing that the country not so well, but that the country not so well, but that the country not so well, but that the country functions, it's amazing functions, it's amazing functions.
It's amazing. So we're going to change all of that and so we're going to change all of that and so we're going to change all of that. And when we came down, remember when I - when we came down - remember when I - when we came down, remember when I started this journey when I started this started this journey when I started this started this journey when I started this journey, it was about illegal immigration Journey, it was about illegal immigration journey.
It was about illegal immigration. And these are my friends right here. And - and these are my friends right here. And - and these are my friends right here and they've lost big league, big league. The - they've lost big league, big league. The - they've lost big league, big league, the biggest. They've lost, the biggest, all of biggest.
They've lost. The biggest, all of biggest. They've lost the biggest, all of my friends, unbelievable people. They've my friends, unbelievable people. They've - my friends, unbelievable people. They've lost the biggest. But when I came down, it lost the biggest, but when I came down, it lost the biggest.
But when I came down, it was about illegal immigration and it was - was about illegal immigration and it was - was about illegal immigration and it was about trade and it was about a strong about trade and it was about a strong about trade and it was about A strong military, but basically it was about military, but basically it was about military, but basically it was about illegal immigration and trade and illegal immigration and trade and illegal immigration and trade and bringing her jobs back.
Then we had Paris bringing her jobs back. Then we had Paris bringing her jobs back then we had Paris happen and we had other things happen happen and we had other things happen happen and we had other things happen whether it's in Bernardino or so, many whether it's in Bernardino or so, many, whether it's In Bernardino or so many others and I started saying well, we got others and I started saying well, we got others and I started saying well, we got to toughen up this country.
We have to be to toughen up this country. We have to be to toughen up this country. We have to be very, very smart and very strong and very, very, very smart and very strong and very, very, very smart and very strong and very vigilant, vigilant, vigilant. We have to get people when they see we have to get people when they see we have to get people when they see there are bombs all over the floor of an there are bombs all over the floor of an - there are bombs all over the floor Of an apartment, they have to report these apartment, they have to report these apartment.
They have to report these people to the authorities and they have people to the authorities and they have people to the authorities and they have to report them fast. They have to report to report them fast. They have to report to report them fast. They have to report them fast, no more games, them fast, no more games, them fast, no more games.
You know, the leader of the Paris attack, you know, the leader of the Paris attack, you know the leader of the Paris attack. They couldn't find him. Do you remember they couldn't find him? Do you remember they couldn't find him? Do you remember? And it was almost a year, you know where and it was almost a year, you know where and it was almost a year, you know where he lived right next to where he was.
He lived right next to where he was. He lived right next to where he was living for years. Everybody knew he was living for years. Everybody knew he was living for years. Everybody knew he was there, nobody reported him. They found him there. Nobody reported him. They found him there. Nobody reported him.
They found him through luck. Nobody reported him San through luck. Nobody reported him San through luck. Nobody reported him, San Bernadino, they see all these bombs, all Bernadino, they see all these bombs, all Bernadino. They see all these bombs all over the floor. They say, well, well you over the floor, they say well, well you over the floor, they say well, well, you know not to normal that bombs, all over know not to normal that bombs, all over know not to normal that bombs all over your apartment floor, right.
People saw it your apartment floor, right? People saw it your apartment floor, right? People saw it this maniac over the weekend. Look at his - this maniac over the weekend. Look at his - this maniac over the weekend. Look at his record, people saw what he was doing, record people saw what he was doing, record people saw what he was doing.
First of all, his wife knew. I think his - first of all, his wife knew. I think his first of all, his wife knew. I think his father knew, I think a lot of people knew father knew. I think a lot of people knew father knew. I think a lot of people knew and they didn't report him and we have and they didn't report him.
And we have - and they didn't report him and we have now 50 young people. We have 50 people now, 50 young people. We have 50 people now, 50 young people. We have 50 people dead. We have a tremendous number of dead. We have a tremendous number of dead. We have a tremendous number of people, badly horribly, gravely, injured people, badly horribly, gravely, injured people, badly horribly, gravely injured.
They didn't report him. They knew he was. They didn't report him. They knew he was. They didn't report him. They knew he was going to go. They knew he was going to going to go. They knew he was going to going to go. They knew he was going to explode. Nobody reported him. Nobody they explode. Nobody reported him.
Nobody they explode. Nobody reported him. Nobody they have to report and I've been saying it have to report and I've been saying it have to report and I've been saying it for two weeks, big-league and now all of for two weeks big-league and now all of for two weeks big-league. And now all of a sudden people are saying report, a sudden people are saying, report, a sudden people are saying report, they're saying report, okay?
They're saying report, okay? They're saying report, okay. So here's one other thing, folks we have. So here's one other thing. Folks we have - so here's one other thing. Folks, we have a country that's bust, right? We have a - a country that's bust, right? We have a - a country that's bust, right? We have a country that's - but we protect Japan, we country that's - but we protect Japan.
We country that's but we protect Japan, we protect Germany, we protect Saudi Arabia, protect Germany. We protect Saudi Arabia, protect Germany, we protect Saudi Arabia, we protect South Korea, we protect all we protect South Korea, we protect all we protect South Korea. We protect all these countries and they don't pay us these countries and they don't pay us these countries and they don't pay us what it costs.
They don't pay us. We're what it costs. They don't pay us. We're what it costs, they don't pay us. We're losing a fortune, we have to go to those, losing a fortune. We have to go to those losing a fortune. We have to go to those countries which are wonderful countries, countries which are wonderful countries, countries which are wonderful countries.
We have to say we need help now. Hillary, we have to say we need help now. Hillary, we have to say we need help now. Hillary said how dare Donald Trump say that. He said how dare Donald Trump say that he said how dare Donald Trump say that he wants to abandon Japan. I don't want to wants to abandon Japan.
I don't want to wants to abandon Japan. I don't want to abandon Japan now. Here's the problem. Abandon Japan, now here's the problem, abandon Japan. Now here's the problem with what she said by her saying that with what she said by her saying that with what she said by her saying that you can never make a good deal because you can never make a good deal because you can never make a Good deal because she's saying under no circumstance, she's saying under no circumstance, she's saying under no circumstance folks, we have to be prepared to walk.
I folks we have to be prepared to walk. I folks we have to be prepared to walk. I don't want to walk - hopefully we're not - don't want to walk - hopefully we're not, don't want to walk - hopefully we're not going to walk. But if you don't say going to walk, but if you don't say going to walk, but if you don't say you're going to walk or if you're not, you're going to walk or if you're not, you're going to walk or if you're not prepared to work, you're Never going to prepared to work, you're never going to prepared to work.
You're never going to get them to pay, get them to pay, get them to pay, we are losing billions and billions and we are losing billions and billions and we are losing billions and billions. And billions of dollars, billions of dollars, billions of dollars protecting very strong financial, protecting very strong financial, protecting very strong financial behemoths, South Korea, behemoths, South Korea, behemoths, South Korea, how about Saudi Arabia, Saudi Arabia was how about Saudi Arabia, Saudi Arabia was - how about Saudi Arabia?
Saudi Arabia was making 1 billion dollars a day when the - making 1 billion dollars a day when the making 1 billion dollars a day when the oil was right now, they're still making a oil was right now, they're still making a oil was right now. They're still making a fortune if we weren't there fortune, if we weren't there fortune, if we weren't there, Saudi Arabia wouldn't be there for two.
Saudi Arabia wouldn't be there for two. Saudi Arabia wouldn't be there for two weeks. Ok, we protect Saudi Arabia, we pay weeks. Ok, we protect Saudi Arabia, we pay weeks, ok. We protect Saudi Arabia, we pay rent, we pay rent on facilities that we rent, we pay rent on facilities that we rent, we pay rent on facilities that we have, we pay rent and we're protecting.
Have we pay rent and we're protecting, have we pay rent and we're protecting with Japan with our Japan Treaty, if the - with Japan, with our Japan Treaty, if the - with Japan, with our Japan Treaty, if the United States gets attacked, they can - United States gets attacked, they Can United States gets attacked, they can watch the attack on Sony television and watch the attack on Sony television and watch the attack on Sony television and never do a thing.
If they get attacked. We never do a thing. If they get attacked, we never do a thing if they get attacked. We have to use the full force of our armed, have to use the full force of our armed, have to use the full force of our armed forces to protect them ok, who makes forces to protect them ok, who makes forces to protect them.
Ok, who makes these deals who makes these deals who these deals who makes these deals who these deals who makes these deals who makes these deals. So what I'm saying is makes these deals. So what I'm saying is makes these deals. So what I'm saying is this, I have to go my favorite so I get this, I have to go my favorite so I get this.
I have to go my favorite so I get asked by a very good commentator, what do asked by a very good commentator, what do asked by a very good commentator, what do you think of NATO. Now in all fairness, you think of NATO now in all fairness, you think of NATO now in all fairness, I've been doing deals all my life I do.
I've been doing deals all my life. I do. I've been doing deals all my life. I do. You know, I built this great company and you know I built this great company and you know I built this great company and all that stuff and I do deals nobody all that stuff. And I do deals, nobody all that stuff. And I do deals.
Nobody talked about NATO, I mean in all fairness talked about NATO. I mean in all fairness talked about NATO. I mean in all fairness, I'd like to say I have great experience. I'd like to say I have great experience. I'd like to say I have great experience with NATO, but I do have a lot of common with NATO, but I do have a lot of common with NATO. But I do have a lot of common sense and I do have a lot of business sense and I do have a lot of business sense.
And I do have a lot of business instinct like some of my friends out instinct like some of my friends out instinct like some of my friends out here here here. So the question is why do you think of - so the question is why do you think of - so the question is why do you think of NATO sending myself. First thing is NATO sending myself.
First thing is NATO sending myself. First thing is nobody's ever asked me this before. Nobody's ever asked me this before. Nobody's ever asked me this before. Second thing is, well, I said this. I said second thing is, well, I said this. I said second thing is, well, I said this. I said number one, I believe it's obsolete you number one, I believe it's obsolete you number one, I believe it's obsolete, you know, set up many, many years ago about know set up many, many years ago about know set up many, many years ago about the Soviet Union Soviet Union doesn't - the Soviet Union, Soviet Union doesn't - the Soviet Union, Soviet Union doesn't exist now it's Russia.
But Russia is exist now. It's Russia. But Russia is exist now, it's Russia. But Russia is still a big threat. It's okay for Russia, still a big threat. It's okay for Russia, still a big threat, it's okay for Russia. The problem is the problem is that our - the problem is the problem is that our - the problem is the problem is that our new threat is terrorism and NATO wasn't new, threat is terrorism and NATO wasn't new, threat is terrorism and NATO wasn't really set up for Terrorism, they don't really set up for terrorism.
They don't really set up for terrorism. They don't even have the right countries, all right, even have the right countries, all right, even have the right countries. All right? So I said it's obsolete because it - so I said it's obsolete because it - so I said it's obsolete because it doesn't take care and take into account, doesn't take care and take into account, doesn't take care and take into account terrorism, terrorism, terrorism.
Number two, all of these countries, well, a number two, all of these countries, well a number two, all of these countries, well a lot of them don't pay, you know in the lot of them don't pay, you know in the lot of them don't pay. You know, in the real estate business, I have some friends real estate business, I have some friends real estate business.
I have some friends that are in real estate here. They call that are in real estate here. They call that are in real estate here. They call it, they're delinquents, right? They're it, they're delinquents, right? They're it, they're delinquents, right? They're delinquent. They didn't pay their rent delinquent.
They didn't pay their rent delinquent. They didn't pay their rent. These people didn't pay. Now we're - these people didn't pay. Now we're - these people didn't pay, now we're protecting them probably end up in third, protecting them probably end up in third, protecting them probably end up in third world war by protecting these countries world war by protecting these countries world war.
By protecting these countries, they don't even pay or they pay us a, they don't even pay or they pay us a, they don't even pay or they pay us a fraction or they pay us much less than fraction or they pay us much less than fraction or They pay us much less than they've agreed to pay us because nobody they've agreed to pay us because nobody they've agreed to pay us because nobody asks them for money.
In the meantime, we asks them for money. In the meantime, we asks them for money. In the meantime, we have the highest taxes in the world. We have the highest taxes in the world. We have the highest taxes in the world. We have budget deficits that are through have budget deficits that are through have budget deficits that are through the roof.
And by the way, speaking of that, the roof and by the way, speaking of that, the roof and by the way, speaking of that, I'm lowering your taxes lower than any. I'm lowering your taxes lower than any. I'm lowering your taxes lower than any other candidate by far by far. And we're getting rid of these horrible and we're getting rid of these horrible and we're getting rid of these horrible, horrible regulations that are killing horrible regulations that are killing horrible regulations that are killing people and killing small businesses, people and killing small businesses, people and killing Small businesses, we're getting rid of so many of them.
So we're getting rid of so many of them. So we're getting rid of so many of them, so many. So I said, so I said it's obsolete many. So I said - so I said it's obsolete many. So I said - so I said it's obsolete, they don't take care of terrorism and they don't take care of terrorism and they don't take care of terrorism and they're not paying up.
They got to pay up. They're not paying up. They got to pay up. They're not paying up, they got to pay up and it turned out. I was right on both. And it turned out. I was right on both and it turned out. I was right on both counts. But I'll never forget the first counts, but I'll never forget the first counts, but I'll never forget the first three or four days, Donald Trump didn't three or four days.
Donald Trump didn't three or four days. Donald Trump didn't know anything about NATO. I said why know anything about NATO, I said why know anything about NATO. I said why three or four days later, all of a sudden, three or four days later, all of a sudden, three or four days later, all of a sudden people that studied it very closely that people that studied it very closely that people that studied it very Closely that never study anything else, I like to have never study anything else.
I like to have never study anything else. I like to have blinders on, right. They can't see the blinders on, right. They can't see the blinders on right. They can't see the forest for the trees, right? You know the forest for the trees, right? You know the forest for the trees, right? You know the expression, they can't see the forest for expression.
They can't see the forest for expression. They can't see the forest for the ridge all of a sudden, three or four, the ridge, all of a sudden, three or four, the ridge, all of a sudden, three or four days later. People are saying he's days later. People are saying he's days later. People are saying he's brilliant, he's ready.
He's written like brilliant. He's ready. He's written like brilliant. He's ready. He's written like Putin Putin called me brilliant. I like Putin Putin called me brilliant. I like Putin Putin called me brilliant. I like it. They want me to disavow booties that it - they want me to disavow booties that it - they want me to disavow booties that Donald Trump is brilliant.
Essentially Donald Trump is brilliant. Essentially Donald Trump is brilliant. Essentially he'll be the next leader. But Donald, he'll be the next leader, but Donald, he'll be the next leader. But Donald Trump is brilliant and the people I was Trump is brilliant and the people I was Trump is brilliant and the people I was debating against, they said we would like debating against, they said we would like debating against they said we would like you to Disavow that safe and I said you you to disavow that safe and I said you you to disavow that safe and I said you think I'm going to disavow that think I'm going to disavow that think I'm going to disavow that statement.
Are you crazy statement? Are you crazy statement, are you crazy so with NATO? So I went three day and the so with NATO. So I went three day and the so with NATO. So I went three day and the press was just absolutely brutal like I press was just absolutely brutal. Like I press was just absolutely brutal, like I didn't know what the hell I'm talking, didn't know what the hell I'm talking, didn't know what the hell I'm talking about.
Give me a break then three or four about give me a break then three or four about give me a break then three or four days later. The experts are starting to days later. The experts are starting to days later. The experts are starting to say, you know, huh Trump is sooner, right, say, you know, huh? Trump is sooner, right, say, you know, huh?
Trump is sooner, right? It's obsolete. These are people that it's obsolete. These are people that it's obsolete. These are people that study it. Eight hours a day, they studying study it eight hours a day. They studying study it eight hours a day. They studying and they say, you know, Trump could be and they say, you know, Trump could be and they say, you know, Trump could be right and he's right also they're not right and he's right also, they're not right and he's right also, they're not paying up.
They're not paying up, they paying up, they're not paying up, they paying up, they're not paying up. They always a lot of money. Many of these always a lot of money. Many of these always a lot of money. Many of these countries, okay. Now here's what happens. Countries, okay, now here's what happens. Countries, okay.
Now here's what happens about seven days ago front page of The about seven days ago front page of The about seven days ago front page of The Wall Street Journal, big big story NATO Wall Street Journal, big, big story. NATO Wall Street Journal, big, big story, NATO to set up major terrorism unit general to set up major terrorism unit general to set up major terrorism unit general.
So and so to be the head of it, I said so. And so to be the head of it, I said so and so to be the head of it, I said this is what I said. Now they don't give - this is what I said. Now they don't give - this is what I said. Now they don't give me credit for that me credit for that me credit for that. You know, they had a little sentence like you know, they had a little sentence like you know, they had a little sentence like a little one third sentence.
Donald Trump a little one third sentence. Donald Trump a little one third sentence, Donald Trump wasn't happy about. Okay, right, folks, our wasn't happy about. Okay, right folks, our wasn't happy about. Okay, right folks, our country has such incredible potential. We country has such incredible potential.
We country has such incredible potential. We have such incredible. There are so many pockets of fat there. There are so many pockets of fat there. There are so many pockets of fat. There are so many pockets of stupidity we can are so many pockets of stupidity. We can are so many pockets of stupidity. We can bring our country back bigger and better, bring our country back bigger and better, bring our country back bigger and better and stronger than ever before I'm - and stronger than ever before I'm - and stronger than ever before I'm telling.
But just on the military, and I said this, but just on the military and I said this, but just on the military and I said this, I said again, you have to always be - I said again, you have to always be - I said again, you have to Always be prepared to walk, but just in the prepared to walk, but just in the prepared to walk, but just in the military, I said look, we want to help military.
I said, look, we want to help military. I said, look, we want to help Japan. We want to be a great ally to Japan. We want to be a great ally to Japan. We want to be a great ally to Japan. We'll always be friends with Japan. Japan. We'll always be friends with Japan. Japan, we'll always be friends with Japan.
But you know, they got to help us, they - but you know they got to help us, they - but you know they got to help us. They sent, Obama sent a general out and he sent Obama sent a general out and he sent Obama sent a general out and he said doesn't Donald Trump know this is said, doesn't Donald Trump know this is said, doesn't Donald Trump know this is true.
I promise true, I promise true. I promise doesn't Donald Trump know that Japan doesn't. Donald Trump know that Japan doesn't. Donald Trump know that Japan covers 50 % of the costs of the military covers 50 % of the costs of the military covers 50 % of the costs of the military. I said why don't they cover a hundred, I said why don't they cover a hundred.
I said why don't they cover a hundred percent of the cost of the why-why-why percent of the cost of the why-why-why percent of the cost of the why-why-why. Now you know if he said fifty percent now you know if he said fifty percent now you know if he said fifty percent the number is probably twenty five or the number is probably twenty five or the number is probably twenty five or twenty percent.
Okay. Folks. We're like the twenty percent, okay, folks, we're like the twenty percent, okay, folks we're like the country and so true that's being led by country and so true that's being led by country and so true that's being led by the dumb people. It's not going to happen. The dumb people, it's not going to happen.
The dumb people, it's not going to happen any more folks. It's America first to any more folks. It's America first to any more folks, it's America first to America, so America and we're gonna get America. So America and we're gonna get America, so America and we're gonna get it going and we're going to get it going it going and we're going to get it going it going and we're going to get it going like it hasn't been going in many, Many like it hasn't been going in many, many like it hasn't been going in many, many years.
I really made it, you know, my theme years, I really made it, you know, my theme years, I really made it, you know my theme, I see all these hats make America great. I see all these hats make America great. I see all these hats make America great again, white red camo, black, all of these again, white red camo, black, all of these again, white red camo black, all of these hats.
But we're going to, you know the hats, but we're going to, you know the hats, but we're going to - you know, the theme is make America great. Again, I theme is make America great. Again. I theme is make America great again. I honestly believe it will be make America honestly believe it will be make America honestly believe it will be make America great again, make America safe again, safe.
And I really believe, I really, really, and I really believe I really, really and I really believe I really, really believe that our country can be greater believe that our country can be greater, believe that our country can be greater than ever before. I know the people these than ever before, I know the people these than ever before.
I know the people, these are unbelievable you - these are are unbelievable you. These are are unbelievable you. These are unbelievable people and folks we don't unbelievable people and folks we don't unbelievable people and folks we don't win anymore, win anymore, win anymore, right? We don't win anymore.
We don't win, right? We don't win anymore. We don't win, right? We don't win anymore. We don't win, we don't win with anything. We don't win. We don't win with anything. We don't win. We don't win with anything. We don't win on trade. We don't win with the military on trade. We don't win with the military on trade.
We don't win with the military. We're gonna knock the hell out of Isis. We're gonna knock the hell out of Isis. We're gonna knock the hell out of Isis. By the way. We have no choice. We have no - by the way we have no choice. We have no - by the way we have no choice. We have no choice, we have no choice, but we're gonna choice.
We have no choice, but we're gonna choice. We have no choice but we're gonna start winning again. We're gonna win. So start winning again. We're gonna win. So start winning again. We're gonna win so much. You people are gonna get sick of it much you people are gonna get sick of it much you people are gonna get sick of it, you're gonna come up and they're gonna, you're gonna come up and they're gonna, you're gon Na come up and they're gonna call me from Texas.
Mr. Trump, sir, you call me from Texas. Mr. Trump, sir, you call me from Texas. Mr. Trump, sir, you have thousands and thousands of calls have thousands and thousands of calls have thousands and thousands of calls from Texas. They're all your friends. They from Texas, they're all your friends, they from Texas, they're all your friends.
They heard you speak one night. Mr. Trump heard you speak one night. Mr. Trump heard you speak one night. Mr. Trump, they're very upset President Trump. They're very upset President Trump. They're very upset. President Trump, they're very upset. They're gonna walk in and they're gonna, they're gonna walk in and they're gonna, they're gonna walk in and they're gonna say go ahead, what the hell there.
Is it, say, go ahead, what the hell there? Is it, say, go ahead, what the hell there is it? They're gonna walk in. They're gonna say they're gonna walk in. They're gonna say they're gonna walk in. They're gonna say president drop thousands and thousands, president drop thousands and thousands, president drop thousands and thousands of calls from Texas.
They are so upset of calls from Texas. They are so upset of calls from Texas. They are so upset with you. Mr. president, they can't stand with you. Mr. president, they can't stand with you. Mr. president. They can't stand the amount with which you're winning by the amount with which you're winning by the amount with which you're winning by everything is a win, everything is a win.
Everything is a win, you're winning on trade, you're winning, you're winning on trade, you're winning, you're winning on trade, you're winning at the border, you're winning with your - at the border, you're winning with your - at the border, you're winning with your military, you're winning on healthcare, military, You're winning on healthcare, military, you're winning on healthcare, we're gonna repeal that horrible sup and we're gonna repeal that horrible sup and we're gonna repeal that horrible sup and replace it.
Mr. president, sir, replace it. Mr. president, sir, replace it. Mr. president, sir, you're winning with common core, you're - you're winning with common core, you're - you're winning with common core, you're gonna end it and bring education local. Mr. president, sir, they can't believe. Mr. president, sir, they can't believe.
Mr. president, sir, they can't believe you've saved. The Second Amendment 100 % and mr. president, the people of Texas do and mr. president the people of Texas do and mr. president the people of Texas do not want you to win so much. It's driving not want you to win so much. It's driving not want you to win so much, it's driving them crazy and I'm gonna say, tell the them crazy and I'm gonna say, tell the them crazy and I'm gonna say, tell the people of Texas that I love them.
But people of Texas that I love them, but people of Texas that I love them, but we're going to continue to win. We're - we're going to continue to win. We're - we're going to continue to win. We're gonna win so much. We're gonna make gonna win so much, we're gonna make gonna win so much. We're gonna make America great.
Again. I love you. Thank you America. Great again, I love you. Thank you America. Great again, I love you. Thank you all. I love you. Thank you. Thank you all. I love you. Thank you. Thank you all. I love you. Thank you. Thank you you.
